Washington statutes.
RCW 43.216.255

Licensing standards.

(1) No later than November 1, 2016, the department shall implement a single set of licensing standards for child care and the early childhood education and assistance program. The department shall produce the single set of licensing standards within the department's available appropriations. The new licensing standards must:

(a) Provide minimum licensing requirements for child care and preschool programs;

(b) Rely on the standards established in the early achievers program to address quality issues in participating early childhood programs;

(c) Take into account the separate needs of family care providers, outdoor nature-based child care providers, and child care centers; and

(d) Promote the continued safety of child care settings.

(2) Private schools that operate early learning programs and do not receive state subsidy payments shall be subject to the minimum health and safety standards as defined in RCW 43.216.395(2)(b), the health and safety requirements under chapter 28A.195 RCW, and the requirements necessary to assure a sufficient early childhood education to meet usual requirements needed for transition into elementary school. The state, and any agency thereof, shall not restrict or dictate any specific educational or other programs for early learning programs operated by private schools except for programs that receive state subsidy payments.

[ 2021 c 304 s 10; 2015 3rd sp.s. c 7 s 3. Formerly RCW 43.215.201.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2015 3rd sp.s. c 7: See note following RCW 43.216.085.